Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2024 Act is added to and made  a part of ORS chapter 657B.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Family leave for parental bonding” means the family leave  described under ORS
657B.010 (18)(a)(A).
(b) “Grant” means a grant described under ORS 657B.200.
(c) “Projected expenses”  means benefits anticipated to be claimed by covered individuals
under ORS 657B.090, anticipated grant awards, any anticipated costs and  expenses associated
with processing payments of the benefits and grant awards and any other expenses antic-
ipated to be incurred by the Employment Department in carrying out  the provisions of this
chapter.
(d) “Solvency of the fund” and “solvent” means that the cumulative amount  of contrib-
utions collected under the provisions of this  chapter and any other moneys deposited in the
fund are sufficient to pay, in full and in a timely manner, not less than six months of
projected expenses.
(2) The Director of the Employment Department  shall periodically assess the Paid Family
and Medical Leave Insurance Fund established under ORS 657B.430 to make determinations
regarding the solvency of the fund. The director shall use actuarial calculations in making
such determinations and may consider any relevant information including, but not limited
to:
(a) The total cost of administrative expenses incurred by the department during the six-
month period immediately preceding a periodic assessment of the fund.
(b) The number of grant applications received by the department in  the calendar year
immediately preceding a periodic assessment of the fund.
(c) The total grants  awarded in the calendar year immediately preceding a periodic as-
sessment of the fund.
(d) The average amount of weekly benefits paid in the  calendar year immediately pre-
ceding a periodic assessment of the fund.
(e) Annual predictable birth rate data.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1514 (SB 1514-INTRO) Page 1
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision under this chapter, if, pursuant  to subsection (2)
of this section, the director determines that the fund is or may be  insolvent, the director
may take any of the following actions to maintain or restore the solvency of the fund:
(a) Adjust  the maximum weekly benefit amount provided under ORS 657B.050 (2)(a) so
that the maximum weekly benefit amount is  less than 120 percent but not less than 100
percent of the average weekly wage.
(b) Adjust the  weekly benefit amount available to eligible employees under ORS 657B.050
(1)(b) such that the employee’s weekly benefit amount is the sum of:
(A) 65 percent of the average weekly wage; and
(B) Not less than 40 percent of the employee’s average weekly wage that is  greater than
65 percent of the average weekly wage.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision under this chapter:
(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, if, after  taking both of the
actions authorized under subsection (3)(a) and (b) of this section, it is apparent to  the di-
rector that the fund is or  may be insolvent, the director may reduce the number of weeks
that would otherwise be available to a covered individual under ORS 657B.020 (1) to  reflect
that a covered individual may qualify for 10 weeks of family and medical leave  insurance
benefits per benefit year for family leave, medical leave and  safe leave taken individually or
in any combination.
(b) Nothing in this subsection authorizes the director to reduce the number of weeks that
would otherwise be available to a covered individual under ORS 657B.020  (1) for family leave
for parental bonding taken individually or in combination with:
(A) Other family leave, medical leave or safe leave; and
(B) The leave for which a covered individual may qualify under ORS 657B.020 (3).
(5)(a) Whenever an adjustment to  benefits occurs as a result of any action taken by the
director pursuant to subsections (3) and (4) of this section, the adjustment shall remain ef-
fective for not more than five calendar years from the date on which the action was taken.
(b) The director shall discontinue the use of  this section to determine appropriate bene-
fits and shall resume determining benefits in accordance with ORS 657B.020 and 657B.050  not
later than whichever of the following first occurs:
(A) Upon the  director’s determination that resuming determinations in accordance with
the provisions of those sections will not cause volatility in the fund or with respect  to the
administration of the family and medical leave insurance program.
(B) The date described under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(6) Any action taken by the director under this section shall  apply to benefits to be
claimed in benefit years beginning on or after the first day of the first calendar quarter fol-
lowing the date on which the action was taken.
(7) The director shall provide at least 30 days’ advance notice to the public of any changes
to benefits resulting from any action taken by the director under this section,  including the
effective date of such changes.  The director shall give notice to the public by posting the
information on the website maintained by the department.
SECTION 3.
 Section 51, chapter 700, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 51.  (1)(a) The Director of the Employment Department shall submit  to the interim com-
mittees of the Legislative Assembly related to workforce  or business and labor, in the manner pro-
vided in ORS 192.245, reports summarizing the Employment Department’s progress toward
implementing the family and medical leave insurance program described in ORS chapter 657B.
(b) The  director shall submit the first report not later than February 15, 2020, and a second
report not later than September 1, 2022.
(2) Beginning on July 1, 2024, and once during each of the following [ three] five consecutive
biennia, the director shall, to the extent that the  director has acquired the information, submit to
the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related  to workforce or business and labor, in
the manner provided in ORS 192.245, a report that includes:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1514 (SB 1514-INTRO) Page 2
(a) The total number of claims submitted under ORS 657B.090.
(b) The number of claims  allowed under ORS 657B.100 and the number of claims denied under
ORS 657B.100.
(c) The total amount of benefits paid  out of the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund
established under ORS 657B.430.
(d) Data regarding the use of moneys in the fund, the solvency of the fund  and the balance of
the fund.
(e) The amount of contributions collected under ORS 657B.150.
(f) The number of applications for plan approval submitted under ORS 657B.210,  including the
number of plans approved and the costs the department incurred in reviewing such applications.
(g) The number of applications received by the department for employer  assistance and the total
amounts awarded in grants under ORS 657B.200.
(h) A summary of any periodic assessments conducted  by the director pursuant to sec-
tion 2 of this 2024 Act to  determine the solvency of the Paid Family and Medical Leave In-
surance Fund, including a summary of  the information upon which the solvency
determination was based.
(i) A summary of any action that was taken  by the director under section 2 of this 2024
Act to restore the solvency of the fund and the resulting outcomes of such action.
[(h)] (3) The director shall include in the reports described in  this subsection any recommenda-
tions made by the advisory committee under ORS 657B.380.
SECTION 4.
This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate February 14, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House February 27, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1514 (SB 1514-INTRO) Page 3